District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.21

Expired

Findings

Expired.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-217, §§ 2 to 8, 42 DCR 2209
1981 Ed., §§ 1-1152 to 1-1152.6.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-217, March 17, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 143).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-114, May 1, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 2594).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-267, May 8, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2986).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-102, April 30, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2793).
For temporary (225 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-152, September 15, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5023).
For temporary reenactment and amendment, on an emergency basis, of the provisions of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Act of 1992, see §§ 2-8 of the Equal opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-65, April 3, 1997, 44 DCR 2437), and see §§ 2-8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-347, May 6, 1998, 45 DCR 2988).

Expiration of Law 9-217

Section 9(b) of D.C. Law 9-217 provided that the act shall expire 2 years from the date of its taking effect. D.C. Law 9-217 became effective on March 17, 1993.